Utah statutes.
54-8b-11.   Establishing just and reasonable rates.

In administering this title, the commission shall endeavor to make available high-quality, universal telecommunications services at just and reasonable rates for all classes of customers throughout this state.



Enacted by Chapter 96, 1989 General Session

